District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.08

Separate contracts for material and labor.

Repealed.

July 5, 1884, 23 Stat. 125, ch. 227
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(i), 32 DCR 7396

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1113.
1973 Ed., § 1-810.

Prior Codifications